Arkansas, session 2025, SB173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-615(d), concerning the tabulation of
votes and the duplication of damaged or defective ballots, is reenacted to
ratify the decision by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to merge Acts
2023, No. 444, § 6, and Acts 2023, No. 460, § 1.
(d)(1) If any ballot is damaged or defective so that it cannot
properly be counted by the electronic vote tabulating device, a true
duplicate copy shall be made of the damaged ballot.
(2) When duplicating a ballot, and in the presence of another
election official and designated poll watchers, if any, an election official
shall:
(A) Reproduce the selections of the voter on a second
ballot that is the same ballot style as the ballot cast by the voter;
(B) Stamp or write the word “duplicate” on the duplicated
ballot;
(C) Stamp or write the word “original” on the original
damaged or defective ballot;
*SSS003*
01/31/2025 10:16:37 AM SSS003

SB173
(D) Label both the original damaged or defective ballot
and the duplicate ballot with the same unique serial number;
(E) Substitute the duplicated ballot for the original
damaged or defective ballot;
(F) Count the duplicated ballots in the same manner as
other ballots in that election; and
(G) Secure and separately store the original damaged or
defective ballots in the same manner as other ballots in that election.
(3) The duplication of a damaged or defective ballot counted at
the central counting facility shall be conducted by an election official at
the same time and location that ballots with no defects are counted.
(4) The duplication of a damaged or defective ballot cast at a
polling site shall be delivered securely to the county board of election
commissioners to be duplicated by election officials or added to the
precinct's count manually on the night of the election.
(5) An election official under subdivision (d)(2) of this
section shall maintain a recorded count of damaged ballots to be duplicated
in the presence of authorized poll watchers, if any, and provide the report
to the county board of election commissioners.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-6-220(a)(1)(A), concerning reporting of
independent expenditures, is reenacted to ratify the decision by the Arkansas
Code Revision Commission to change "five-hundred-dollar" to "two-hundred-
dollar" in order to correct a reference error.
(1)(A) No later than fifteen (15) days following the month in
which the two-hundred-dollar threshold required under this section is met,
the first financial report shall be filed.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-9-127(a)(6), concerning interference with
initiative petitions and proposed measures, is reenacted to ratify the
decision by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to change the ending
conjunction from “and” to “or”.
(6) Misrepresents the purpose and effect of the petition or the
measure affected for the purpose of causing a person to not sign a petition
when acting as a canvasser; or

01/31/2025 10:16:37 AM SSS003

SB173
SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.



















01/31/2025 10:16:37 AM SSS003